Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1239
Subpoena to party; failure to attend and testify; continuance; costs.

In addition to the above remedies, if a party to a suit in his own right on being duly subpoenaed, failed to appear and give testimony, the other party may, at his option, have a continuance of the cause as in cases of other witnesses, and at the cost of the delinquent.

R.S.1867, Code § 398, p. 460;

R.S.1913, § 7931;

C.S.1922, § 8873;

C.S.1929, § 20-1239;

R.S.1943, § 25-1239.